Washington statutes.
RCW 43.19.19190

Surplus property—Exemption for original or historic state capitol furnishings.

Original or historic furnishings from the state capitol group under RCW 27.48.040 do not constitute surplus property under this chapter.

[ 1999 c 343 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—Purpose—1999 c 343: See note following RCW 27.48.040.